src/fst/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON itte_refl
+Attr:e     Px ;
+Attr+Err/Orth:e  K ;
+Attr:e     KK ;
+Nom:e      Px ;
+Nom+Err/Orth:e  K ;
+Nom:e      KK ;
+Gen:en     PxK ;
+Ill:heen   PxK ;
+Par:ee     PxK ;
+Par:eä     PxK ;
+Par:iä     PxK ;
+Ess:enä    PxK ;
+Tra:eksi   PxK ;
+Ine:essä   PxK ;
+Ela:estä   PxK ;
+All:ele    PxK ;
+Ade:elä    PxK ;
+Abl:eltä   PxK ;

!LEXICON kukin_kvant
!+Nom:ki         K ;
!+Nom:kin        K ;
!+Gen:nki        K ;
!+Ill:hnki       K ;
!+Par:taki       K ;
!+Ess:naki       K ;
!+Tra:ksiki      K ;
!+Ine:ssaki      K ;
!+Ela:staki      K ;
!+All:lleki      K ;
!+Ade:llaki      K ;
!+Abl:ltaki      K ;


!LEXICON kekin_kvant ! ed. rinnakkaismuotoja
!+Gen:nenki    K ;
!+Ill:henki  K ;
!+Par:taki   K ;
!+Ess:näki    K ;
!+Tra:ksiki   K ;
!+Ine:ssäki   K ;
!+Ela:stäki   K ;
!+All:lleki    K ;
!+Ade:lläki    K ;
!+Abl:ltäki   K ;


!LEXICON sgkum_kvant
!+Nom:piki K ;
!+Gen:manki K ;
!+Ill:phaanki K ;
!+Par:ppaaki K ; 
!+Par:paaki K ;
!+Ess:panaki    K ;
!+Tra:maksiki   K ;
!+Ine:massaki    K ;
!+Ela:mastaki    K ;
!+All:malleki    K ;
!+Ade:mallaki    K ;
!+Abl:maltaki    K ;
!
!
!LEXICON plkum_kvant
!+Nom:matki K ;
!+Gen:ppinki K ; 
!+Gen:mittenki K ;
!+Ill:phiinki K ;
!+Par:ppiiki K ;
!+Par:piaki K ;
!+Ess:pinaki    K ;
!+Tra:miksiki   K ;
!+Ine:missaki    K ;
!+Ela:mistaki    K ;
!+All:mileki   K ;
!+Ade:milaki   K ;
!+Abl:miltaki   K ;


!LEXICON molem_kvant
!+Nom:at K ;
!+Gen:man K ;
!+Ill:phaan K ;
!+Par:ppaa K ;
!+Ess:panna    K ; 
!+Tra:aksi   K ;
!+Ine:assa    K ;
!+Ela:asta    K ;
!+All:ale    K ;
!+Ade:ila    K ;
!+Abl:alta    K ;

!LEXICON moni_kvant
!+Sg+Nom:i K ;
!+Sg+Par:ta K ;
!+Sg+Gen:en K ;
!+Sg+Ess:ena    K ;
!+Sg+Tra:eksi   K ;
!+Sg+Ine:essa   K ;
!+Sg+Ela:esta   K ;
!+Sg+All:ele   K ;
!+Sg+Ade:ela    K ;
!+Sg+Abl:elta   K ;
!+Pl+Nom:et K ;
!+Pl+Par:iq K ;
!+Pl+Gen:3en K ;
!+Pl+Ess:ina    K ;
!+Pl+Tra:iksi   K ;
!+Pl+Ine:issa   K ;
!+Pl+Ela:ista   K ;
!+Pl+All:ile   K ;
!+Pl+Ade:ila    K ;
!+Pl+Abl:ilta   K ;



!LEXICON kielto
!+Gen:nenkhään K ;
!+Ill:nheenkhään K ;
!+Par:thään K ;
!+Ess:nenäkhään    K ;
!+Tra:neksikhään   K ;
!+Ine:nessäkhään   K ;
!+Ela:nestäkhään   K ;
!+All:nelekhään   K ;
!+All:lheen   K ; 
!+Ade:keläkhään    K ;
!+Ade:thään    K ;
!+Abl:neltäkhään   K ;
!+Abl:lthään   K ; 


LEXICON mi_kielto
+Nom:khään K ;
+Gen:nkhään K ;
+Ill:hinkhään K ;
+Par:thään K ;
+Ess:nhään    K ;
+Tra:ksikhään   K ;
+Ine:shään   K ;
+Ela:sthään   K ;
+All:llekhään   K ; !m. kelheen, lisätty ed. leksikoon
+Ade:lhään    K ; !m. kethään
+Abl:thään   K ; !m. kelthään


!LEXICON yht_kielto
!+Nom:   K  ;
!+Ill:heenkään   K ;
!+Par:äkhään   K ;
!
!
!LEXICON kump_kielto
!+Ill:haankaan   K ;
!
!
!
!LEXICON sgus_kvant
!+Nom:see       K ;
!+Nom:sea       K ;
!+Nom:sie       K ;
!+Gen:heen    K ;
!+Gen:ean    K ;
!+Gen:ian    K ;
!+Ill:heesseen  K ;
!+Ill:ehan  K ;
!+Ill:ihan  K ;
!+Par:heeta   K ;
!+Par:eaa   K ;
!+Par:iaa   K ;
!+Ess:heena    K ;
!+Ess:eana    K ;
!+Ess:iana    K ;
!+Tra:heeksi   K ;
!+Tra:eaksi   K ;
!+Tra:iaksi   K ;
!+Ine:heessa   K ;
!+Ela:heesta   K ;
!+Ela:easta   K ;
!+Ela:iasta   K ;
!+All:heele    K ;
!+All:ealle    K ;
!+All:ialle    K ;
!+Ade:heela    K ;
!+Ade:ealla    K ;
!+Ade:ialla    K ;
!+Abl:heelta   K ;
!+Abl:ealta   K ;
!+Abl:ialta   K ;


!LEXICON plushe_kvant
!+Nom:eet       K ;
!+Gen:itten    K ;
!+Ill:issiin  K ;
!+Par:ita   K ;
!+Ess:ina    K ;
!+Tra:iksi   K ;
!+Ine:issa   K ;
!+Ela:ista   K ;
!+All:ile    K ;
!+Ade:ila    K ;
!+Abl:ilta   K ;
!
!
!LEXICON plus_kvant
!+Nom:eat    K ;
!+Nom:iat    K ;
!
!
!LEXICON plpaljo_kvant
!+Ela:sta  K ;
!+All:ile  K ;
!
!LEXICON plmon_kvant
!+All:ile    K ;



LEXICON doublecasepronouns

< j o m p:0 i:0 k:0 u:0 m:0 p:0 i:0 "+Pron":0 "+Indef":0 "+Sg":0> sgcases ;


LEXICON  sgcases
< "@U.pron.nom@" 0:p 0:i > Continuing ;
< "@U.pron.gen@" 0:m 0:a 0:n > Continuing ;
< "@U.pron.ill@" 0:p 0:h 0:a 0:a 0:n > Continuing ;
< "@U.pron.par@" 0:p 0:p 0:a 0:a > Continuing ;
< "@U.pron.par2@" 0:p 0:a 0:a > Continuing ;
< "@U.pron.ess@" 0:p 0:a 0:n 0:a > Continuing ;
< "@U.pron.tra@" 0:m 0:a 0:k 0:s 0:i > Continuing ;
< "@U.pron.ine@" 0:m 0:a 0:s 0:a 0:a > Continuing ;
< "@U.pron.ela@" 0:m 0:a 0:s 0:t 0:a > Continuing ;
< "@U.pron.all@" 0:m 0:a 0:l 0:e > Continuing ;
< "@U.pron.ade@" 0:m 0:a 0:l 0:a > Continuing ;
< "@U.pron.abl@" 0:m 0:a 0:l 0:t 0:a > Continuing ;


LEXICON Continuing
:kum  Endsgcases;

LEXICON  Endsgcases

< "@U.pron.nom@" "+Nom":0 0:p 0:i > K ; 
< "@U.pron.gen@" "+Gen":0 0:m 0:a 0:n > K ;
< "@U.pron.ill@" "+Ill":0 0:p 0:h 0:a 0:a 0:n > K ;
< "@U.pron.par@" "+Par":0 0:p 0:p 0:a 0:a > K ;
< "@U.pron.par2@" "+Par":0 0:p 0:a 0:a > K ; 
< "@U.pron.ess@" "+Ess":0 0:p 0:a 0:n 0:a > K ;
< "@U.pron.tra@" "+Tra":0 0:m 0:a 0:k 0:s 0:i > K ;
< "@U.pron.ine@" "+Ine":0 0:m 0:a 0:s 0:s 0:a > K ;
< "@U.pron.ela@" "+Ela":0 0:m 0:a 0:s 0:t 0:a > K ;
< "@U.pron.all@" "+All":0 0:m 0:a 0:l 0:e > K ; 
< "@U.pron.ade@" "+Ade":0 0:m 0:a 0:l 0:a > K ; 
< "@U.pron.abl@" "+Abl":0 0:m 0:a 0:l 0:t 0:a > K ;


!LEXICON doublecasepronounspl
!< j o m m:0 a:0 t:0 k:0 u:0 m:0 m:0 a:0 t:0 "+Pron":0 "+Indef":0 "+Pl":0 > plcases ;

!kohta, 
!jommat+Pron+Indef+Pl:jom                pljom_indef ;
!kummat+Pron+Indef+Pl:kum                plkum_indef ;


!LEXICON  plcases
!< "@U.pron.nom@" 0:m 0:a 0:t >              Continues ;
!< "@U.pron.gen@" 0:m 0:p 0:i 0:i 0:n >      Continues ;
!< "@U.pron.gen2@" 0:m 0:i 0:t 0:t 0:e 0:n > Continues ;
!< "@U.pron.ill@" 0:p 0:h 0:i 0:i 0:n >      Continues ;
!< "@U.pron.par@" 0:p 0:p 0:i 0:i >          Continues ;
!< "@U.pron.par2@" 0:p 0:i 0:i >             Continues ;
!< "@U.pron.ess@" 0:p 0:i 0:n 0:a >          Continues ;
!< "@U.pron.tra@" 0:m 0:i 0:k 0:s 0:i >      Continues ;
!< "@U.pron.ine@" 0:m 0:i 0:s 0:a 0:a >      Continues ;
!< "@U.pron.ela@" 0:m 0:i 0:s 0:t 0:a >      Continues ;
!< "@U.pron.all@" 0:m 0:i 0:l 0:e >          Continues ;
!< "@U.pron.ade@" 0:m 0:i 0:l 0:a >          Continues ;
!< "@U.pron.abl@" 0:m 0:i 0:l 0:t 0:a >      Continues ;


!LEXICON Continues
!:kum  Endplcases;
!
!LEXICON  Endplcases
!
!< "@U.pron.nom@" "+Nom":0 0:m 0:a 0:t > K ; 
!< "@U.pron.gen@" "+Gen":0 0:p 0:p 0:i 0:i 0:n > K ;
!< "@U.pron.gen@" "+Gen":0 0:m 0:i 0:t 0:t 0:e 0:n > K ;
!< "@U.pron.ill@" "+Ill":0 0:p 0:h 0:i 0:i 0:n > K ;
!< "@U.pron.par@" "+Par":0 0:p 0:p 0:i 0:i > K ;
!< "@U.pron.par2@" "+Par":0 0:p 0:i 0:i > K ; 
!< "@U.pron.ess@" "+Ess":0 0:p 0:i 0:n 0:a > K ;
!< "@U.pron.tra@" "+Tra":0 0:m 0:i 0:k 0:s 0:i > K ;
!< "@U.pron.ine@" "+Ine":0 0:m 0:i 0:s 0:s 0:a > K ;
!< "@U.pron.ela@" "+Ela":0 0:m 0:i 0:s 0:t 0:a > K ;
!< "@U.pron.all@" "+All":0 0:m 0:i 0:l 0:e > K ; 
!< "@U.pron.ade@" "+Ade":0 0:m 0:i 0:l 0:a > K ; 
!< "@U.pron.abl@" "+Abl":0 0:m 0:i 0:l 0:t 0:a > K ;
