src/fst/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON Pronoun  !!≈ * @CODE@ 
itte+Pron+Refl:itt  itte_refl ;
itte+Pron+Refl+Err/Orth:its  itte_refl ;
mihkään+Pron+Indef:mi mi_kielto ;
